California, session 20252026, AB1411.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2105 of the Elections Code is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 2105 is added to the Elections Code, to read:2105. (a) It is the intent of the Legislature to maintain voter registration at the highest possible level.(b) A county that does not satisfy the conditions to conduct an all-mailed ballot election pursuant to Section 4005 shall design and implement a voter education and outreach plan pursuant to this section. The purpose of the plan shall be to identify and register qualified electors who are not registered to vote and to encourage participation in the electoral process.(c) Each voter education and outreach plan shall, at a minimum, provide information to the public about online voter registration, preregistration opportunities, vote by mail procedures, ballot tracking services, options for military and overseas voters, options for voters with disabilities, options for in-person voting opportunities, language accessibility, and key election dates and deadlines.(d) (1) The Secretary of State shall provide county elections officials a template for their voter education and outreach plans.(2) (A) The Secretary of State shall make the most current version of each voter education and outreach plan available on the Secretary of State’s internet website.(B) The county elections official shall make the most current version of its voter education and outreach plan available on the county elections internet website.(3) County elections officials shall submit any amendments to their voter education and outreach plans to the Secretary of State by October 1 of each odd-numbered year. SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.